tests/кино.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах кино":
    кино<n><nom> :  кино 
    кино<n><gen> :  кинон 
    кино<n><dat> :  кинона 
    кино<n><loc> :  кинора 
    кино<n><abl> :  киноран 
    кино<n><ins> :  кинопа 
    кино<n><abe> :  киносӑр 
    кино<n><ben> :  киношӑн
    кино<n><px1sg><nom> :  кином 
    кино<n><px1sg><gen> :  киномӑн 
    кино<n><px1sg><dat> :  кинома 
    кино<n><px1sg><loc> :  киномра 
    кино<n><px1sg><abl> :  киномран 
    кино<n><px1sg><ins> :  киномпа 
    кино<n><px1sg><abe> :  киномсӑр 
    кино<n><px1sg><ben> :  киномшӑн
    кино<n><px2sg><nom> :  кину 
    кино<n><px2sg><gen> :  кинун 
    кино<n><px2sg><dat> :  кинуна 
    кино<n><px2sg><loc> :  кинунта 
    кино<n><px2sg><abl> :  кинунтан 
    кино<n><px2sg><ins> :  кинупа 
    кино<n><px2sg><abe> :  кинусӑр 
    кино<n><px2sg><ben> :  кинушӑн
    кино<n><px3sp><nom> :  киновӗ 
    кино<n><px3sp><gen> :  киновӗн 
    кино<n><px3sp><dat> :  киновӗне 
    кино<n><px3sp><loc> :  киновӗнче 
    кино<n><px3sp><abl> :  киновӗнчен 
    кино<n><px3sp><ins> :  киновӗпе 
    кино<n><px3sp><abe> :  киновӗсӗр 
    кино<n><px3sp><ben> :  киновӗшӗн
    кино<n><px1pl><nom> :  киномӑр 
    кино<n><px1pl><gen> :  киномӑрӑн 
    кино<n><px1pl><dat> :  киномӑра 
    кино<n><px1pl><loc> :  киномӑрта 
    кино<n><px1pl><abl> :  киномӑртан 
    кино<n><px1pl><ins> :  киномӑрпа 
    кино<n><px1pl><abe> :  киномӑрсӑр 
    кино<n><px1pl><ben> :  киномӑршӑн
    кино<n><px2pl><nom> :  кинӑр 
    кино<n><px2pl><gen> :  кинӑрӑн 
    кино<n><px2pl><dat> :  кинӑра 
    кино<n><px2pl><loc> :  кинӑрта 
    кино<n><px2pl><abl> :  кинӑртан 
    кино<n><px2pl><ins> :  кинӑрпа 
    кино<n><px2pl><abe> :  кинӑрсӑр 
    кино<n><px2pl><ben> :  кинӑршӑн
    кино<n><pl><nom> :  киносем 
    кино<n><pl><gen> :  киносен 
    кино<n><pl><dat> :  киносене 
    кино<n><pl><loc> :  киносенче 
    кино<n><pl><abl> :  киносенчен 
    кино<n><pl><ins> :  киносемпе 
    кино<n><pl><abe> :  киносемсӗр 
    кино<n><pl><ben> :  киносемшӗн
    кино<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  киномсем 
    кино<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  киномсен 
    кино<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  киномсене 
    кино<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  киномсенче 
    кино<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  киномсенчен 
    кино<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  киномсемпе 
    кино<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  киномсемсӗр 
    кино<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  киномсемшӗн
    кино<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  кинусем 
    кино<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  кинусен 
    кино<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  кинусене 
    кино<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  кинусенче 
    кино<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  кинусенчен 
    кино<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  кинусемпе 
    кино<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  кинусемсӗр 
    кино<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  кинусемшӗн
    кино<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  киновӗсем 
    кино<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  киновӗсен 
    кино<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  киновӗсене 
    кино<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  киновӗсенче 
    кино<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  киновӗсенчен 
    кино<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  киновӗсемпе 
    кино<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  киновӗсемсӗр 
    кино<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  киновӗсемшӗн
    кино<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  киномӑрсем 
    кино<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  киномӑрсен 
    кино<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  киномӑрсене 
    кино<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  киномӑрсенче 
    кино<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  киномӑрсенчен 
    кино<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  киномӑрсемпе 
    кино<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  киномӑрсемсӗр 
    кино<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  киномӑрсемшӗн
    кино<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  кинӑрсем 
    кино<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  кинӑрсен 
    кино<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  кинӑрсене 
    кино<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  кинӑрсенче 
    кино<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  кинӑрсенчен 
    кино<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  кинӑрсемпе 
    кино<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  кинӑрсемсӗр 
    кино<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  кинӑрсемшӗн
